Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB755.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 519.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of falsely reporting an incident when the person:
(a) Knowingly causes a false alarm of fire or other emergency to be transmitted
to or within any organization, official or volunteer, that deals with
emergencies involving danger to life or property, and the false report results
in an emergency response; or
(b) Reports to law enforcement authorities an offense or incident within their
official concern knowing that it did not occur; or
(c) Furnishes law enforcement authorities with information allegedly relating to
an offense or incident within their official concern when the person knows he
or she has no information relating to such offense or incident; or
(d) Knowingly gives false information to any law enforcement officer with intent
to implicate another; or
(e) Initiates or circulates a report or warning of an alleged occurrence or
impending occurrence of a fire or other emergency under circumstances likely
to cause public inconvenience or alarm when the person knows the
information reported, conveyed, or circulated is false or baseless, and the false
report results in an emergency response.
(2) (a) Falsely reporting an incident under subsection (1)(b) or[,] (c)[, or (d)] of this
section is a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) Falsely reporting an incident under subsection (1)(d) of this section is a
Class A misdemeanor unless the false report implicates another of a felony,
in which case it is a felony of the same class as the offense of the accused
crime in the false report.
(c) Falsely reporting an incident under subsection (1)(a) or (e) of this section is a
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:11 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1924
Class D felony.
(3) Any violation under this section may be prosecuted in any county where:
(a) The defendant resides;
(b) The false report was communicated; or
(c) There was an emergency response to the false report.
(4) (a) The court, in imposing a sentence on a defendant who has been convicted of
any offense under this section, shall order restitution to:
1. Any agency or organization for the reasonable costs of the emergency
response incurred by that agency or organization resulting from the false
report; and
2. Any person who suffered damages caused by the agency or organization
that provided an emergency response.
(b) An order of restitution under this subsection shall, for the purpose of
enforcement, be treated as a civil judgment.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:11 AM Jacketed